Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-350
Snowmobile, defined.

Snowmobile means a self-propelled vehicle designed to travel on snow or ice or a natural terrain steered by wheels, skis, or runners and propelled by a belt-driven track with or without steel cleats.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 50.